Utah statutes.
55-5a-1.   Legislative purpose.

The purpose of this act is to further the policy of this state to prohibit the sale, distribution, exhibition, advertisement or marketing of any products or services which are falsely represented to be blind-made and to prohibit solicitations which give the false impression of helping or representing the blind of Utah.

